Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 60
UNIFORM PARTNERSHIP LAW

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Uniform Partnership Act (1997)", see article 64 of this title; for recovery of personal judgments limited to parties served, see § 13-50-105 and rule 54(e), C.R.C.P.; for joint rights and obligations, see article 50 of title 13 and § 38-11-101; for pleading proper parties, see § 13-25-117; for mining partnerships, see article 44 of title 34; for filing affidavits of firm names, see §§ 7-71-101, 7-71-103, 7-71-104, 7-71-106, and 7-71-108; for the "Uniform Records Retention Act", see article 17 of title 6.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

hoice of Entities in

C

olorado", see 23 Colo. Law. 293 (1993); for article, "Choice of Entity in Colorado: An Update", see 25 Colo. Law. 3 (Oct. 1996); for article, "Colorado Choice of Entity 1998", see 27 Colo. Law. 5 (June 1998); for article, "Contractually Binding Colorado Entities", see 28 Colo. Law. 33 (Dec. 1999); for article, "Colorado Choice of Form of Organization and Structure 2001", see 30 Colo. Law. 11 (Oct. 2001); for article "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2001 Update", see 30 Colo. Law. 81 (Oct. 2001); for article "No Paper Required: Business Entity Legislation Makes Life Easier for Business Lawyers", see 33 Colo. Law 6 (June 2004); for article "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2004 Update", see 34 Colo. Law. 11 (Jan. 2005).

Section

7-60-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Partnership Law".

Source:

L. 31:

p. 645, § 1.

CSA:

C. 123, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-1.

7-60-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Bankrupt" includes bankrupt or debtor under the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, or insolvent under any state insolvency act.

"Business" includes every trade, occupation, or profession.

"Conveyance" includes every assignment, lease, mortgage, or encumbrance.

"Court" includes every court and judge having jurisdiction in the case.

(4.5) Repealed.

(4.7) "Limited liability partnership" means a partnership that has registered under section 7-60-144.

Repealed.

"Real property" includes land and any interest or estate in land.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1421, § 67, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 31:

p. 645, § 2.

CSA:

C. 123, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-2.

L. 80:

(1) amended, p. 782, § 1, June 5.

L. 95:

(4.5) and (7) added, p. 778, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

(4.5)(b) and (5)(b) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

L. 2004:

(4.7) added and (7) amended, p. 1421, § 67, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsections (4.5)(b) and (5)(b) provided for the repeal of subsections (4.5) and (5) respectively, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

7-60-103. Knowledge and notice.

A person has "knowledge" of a fact within the meaning of this article not only when the person has actual knowledge thereof but also when the person has knowledge of such other facts as in the circumstances show bad faith.

A person has "notice" of a fact within the meaning of this article when the person who claims the benefit of the notice:

States the fact to such person; or

Delivers through the mail or by other means of communication a written statement of the facts to such person or to a proper person at such person or recipient's place of business or residence.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 646, § 3.

CSA:

C. 123, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-3.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2)(b) amended, p. 1421, § 68, effective July 1.

7-60-104. Rules of construction.

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this article.

The law of estoppel shall apply under this article.

The law of agency shall apply under this article.

This article shall be so interpreted and construed as to effect its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

This article shall not be construed so as to impair the obligations of any contract existing prior to April 17, 1931, nor to affect any action or proceedings begun or right accrued before said date.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 646, § 4.

CSA:

C. 123, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-4.

7-60-105. Rules for cases not covered.

In any case not provided for in this article, the rules of law and equity, including the law merchant, shall govern.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 647, § 5.

CSA:

C. 123, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-5.

7-60-106. Partnership defined.

A partnership is an association of two or more persons to carry on, as co-owners, a business for profit and includes, without limitation, a limited liability partnership.

But any association formed under any other statute of this state or any statute adopted by an authority other than the authority of this state is not a partnership under this article unless such association has been a partnership in this state prior to April 17, 1931. This article shall apply to limited partnerships except insofar as the statutes relating to such partnerships are inconsistent herewith.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 647, § 6.

CSA:

C. 123, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-6.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 778, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1422, § 69, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For provisions on limited partnerships, see articles 61 and 62 of this title.

7-60-107. Partnership determined - how.

In determining whether a partnership exists these rules shall apply:

Except as provided by section 7-60-116, persons who are not partners as to each other are not partners as to third persons;

Joint tenancy, tenancy in common, tenancy by the entireties, joint property, common property, or part ownership does not of itself establish a partnership, whether such co-owners do or do not share any profits made by the use of the property;

The sharing of gross returns does not of itself establish a partnership, whether or not the persons sharing them have a joint or common right or interest in any property from which the returns are derived;

The receipt by a person of a share of the profits of a business is prima facie evidence that the person is a partner in the business, but no such inference shall be drawn if such profits were received in payment:

As a debt by installments or otherwise;

As wages of an employee or rent to a landlord;

As an annuity to a surviving spouse or representative of a deceased partner;

As interest on a loan, though the amount of payment varies with the profits of the business;

As the consideration for the sale of a goodwill of a business or other property by installments or otherwise.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 647, § 7.

CSA:

C. 123, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-7.

L. 77:

(1)(d)(III) amended, p. 294, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

IP(1)(d) amended, p. 1422, § 70, effective July 1.

7-60-108. Partnership property.

All property originally brought into the partnership stock or subsequently acquired by purchase or otherwise on account of the partnership is partnership property.

Unless the contrary intention appears, property acquired with partnership funds is partnership property.

Any estate in real property may be acquired in the partnership name. Title so acquired can be conveyed only in the partnership name.

A conveyance to a partnership in the partnership name, though without words of inheritance, passes the entire estate of the grantor unless a contrary intent appears.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 648, § 8.

CSA:

C. 123, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-8.

7-60-109. Partner agent of partnership.

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under section 7-64-303, every partner is an agent of the partnership for the purpose of its business, and the act of every partner, including the execution in the partnership name of any instrument for apparently carrying on in the usual way the business of the partnership of which the partner is a member, binds the partnership, unless the partner so acting has in fact no authority to act for the partnership in the particular matter and the person with whom the partner is dealing has knowledge of the fact that the partner has no such authority.

An act of a partner which is not apparently for the carrying on of the business of the partnership in the usual way does not bind the partnership unless authorized by the other partners.

Unless authorized by the other partners or unless they have abandoned the business, one or more but less than all the partners have no authority to:

Assign the partnership property in trust for creditors or on the assignee's promise to pay the debts of the partnership;

Dispose of the goodwill of the business;

Do any other act which would make it impossible to carry on the ordinary business of the partnership;

Confess a judgment.

Repealed.

No act of a partner in contravention of a restriction on authority shall bind the partnership to persons having knowledge of the restriction.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 649, § 9.

CSA:

C. 123, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-9.

L. 75:

(3)(e) repealed, p. 578, § 3, effective July 14.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1422, § 71, effective July 1.

7-60-110. Conveyance of real property.

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under section 7-64-303, where title to real property is in the partnership name, any partner may convey title to such property by a conveyance executed in the partnership name; except that the partnership may recover such property unless the partner's act binds the partnership under the provisions of section 7-60-109 (1) or unless such property has been conveyed by the grantee or a person claiming through such grantee to a holder for value without knowledge that the partner, in making the conveyance, has exceeded the partner's authority.

Where title to real property is in the name of the partnership, a conveyance executed by a partner in the partner's own name passes the equitable interest of the partnership if the act is one within the authority of the partner under the provisions of section 7-60-109 (1).

Where title to real property is in the name of one or more but not all the partners and the record does not disclose the right of the partnership, the partners in whose name the title stands may convey title to such property, but the partnership may recover such property if the partner's act does not bind the partnership under the provisions of section 7-60-109 (1), unless the purchaser or the purchaser's assignee is a holder for value, without knowledge.

Where the title to real property is in the name of one or more or all the partners or in a third person in trust for the partnership, a conveyance executed by a partner in the partnership name or in the partner's own name passes the equitable interest of the partnership if the act is one within the authority of the partner under the provisions of section 7-60-109 (1).

Where the title to real property is in the names of all the partners, a conveyance executed by all the partners passes all their rights in such property.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 650, § 10.

CSA:

C. 123, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-10.

L. 2004:

(1) to (4) amended, p. 1422, § 72, effective July 1.

7-60-111. Admission of partner binds partnership.

An admission or representation made by any partner concerning partnership affairs within the scope of the partner's authority as conferred by this article is evidence against the partnership.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 651, § 11.

CSA:

C. 123, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-11.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1423, § 73, effective July 1.

7-60-112. Notice to partner - effect.

Notice to any partner of any matter relating to partnership affairs and the knowledge of the partner acting in the particular matter acquired while a partner or then present to the partner's mind and the knowledge of any other partner who reasonably could and should have communicated it to the acting partner operate as notice to or knowledge of the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 651, § 12.

CSA:

C. 123, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-12.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1423, § 74, effective July 1.

7-60-113. Partner's wrongful acts - liability.

Where, by any wrongful act or omission of any partner acting in the ordinary course of the business of the partnership or with the authority of the other partners, loss or injury is caused to any person, not being a partner in the partnership, or any penalty is incurred, the partnership is liable therefor to the same intent as the partner so acting or omitting to act.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 652, § 13.

CSA:

C. 123, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-13.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1423, § 75, effective July 1.

7-60-114. Partner's breach of trust - liability.

The partnership is bound to make good the loss:

Where one partner acting within the scope of such partner's apparent authority receives money or property of a third person and misapplies it; and

Where the partnership in the course of its business receives money or property of a third person and the money or property so received is misapplied by any partner while it is in the custody of the partnership.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 652, § 14.

CSA:

C. 123, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-14.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1423, § 76, effective July 1.

7-60-115. Nature of partner's liability.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, all partners are liable:

Jointly and severally for everything chargeable to the partnership under sections 7-60-113 and 7-60-114;

Jointly and severally for all other debts and obligations of the partnership, but any partner may enter into a separate obligation to perform a partnership contract.

Except as otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, partners in a limited liability partnership are not liable directly or indirectly, including by way of indemnification, contribution, or otherwise, under a judgment, decree, or order of a court, or in any other manner, for a debt, obligation, or liability of or chargeable to the partnership while it is a limited liability partnership; except that this subsection (2) shall not affect the liability of a partner in a limited liability partnership for such partner's own negligence, wrongful acts, or misconduct.

Partners in a limited liability partnership do not become liable, directly or indirectly, for debts, obligations, or liabilities incurred while the partnership was a limited liability partnership merely because the partnership ceases to be a limited liability partnership.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 652, § 15.

CSA:

C. 123, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-15.

L. 73:

p. 1082, § 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 778, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1423, § 77, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For service on partnerships, see rule 4(e)(4), C.R.C.P.; for judgments against partners and partnerships, see rule 54(e), C.R.C.P.; for judgments against partners not served with process, see rule 106 (a)(5), C.R.C.P.; for joint rights and obligations, see § 13-50-101.

7-60-116. Liability of purported partner.

If a person, by words or conduct, purports to be a partner or consents to being represented by another as a partner, in a partnership or with one or more persons not partners, the purported partner is liable to a person to whom the representation is made, if that person, relying on the representation, enters into a transaction with the actual or purported partnership. If the representation, either by the purported partner or by a person with the purported partner's consent, is made in a public manner, the purported partner is liable to a person who relies upon the purported partnership even if the purported partner is not aware of being held out as a partner to the claimant. If a partnership obligation results, the purported partner is liable with respect to that obligation as if the purported partner were a partner in the partnership, and, if the partnership is a limited liability partnership, the purported partner's liability is subject to section 7-60-115 (2) as if the purported partner were a partner in the limited liability partnership. If no partnership obligation results, the purported partner is liable with respect to that liability jointly and severally with any other person consenting to the representation.

When a partnership liability results, such person is liable as though the person were an actual member of the partnership; except that, in the case of a limited liability partnership, the person's liability is subject to section 7-60-115 (2).

When no partnership liability results, such person is liable jointly with the other persons, if any, so consenting to the contract or representation as to incur liability, otherwise separately.

When a person has been thus represented to be a partner in an existing partnership or with one or more persons not actual partners, the purported partner is an agent of the persons consenting to such representation to bind them to the same extent and in the same manner as though the purported partner were a partner in fact with respect to persons who rely upon the representation. Where all the members of the existing partnership consent to the representation, a partnership act or obligation results; but in all other cases it is the joint act or obligation of the person acting and the persons consenting to the representation.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 653, § 16.

CSA:

C. 123, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-16.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 779, § 4, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 1424, § 78, effective July 1.

7-60-117. Liability of incoming partner.

A person admitted as a partner into an existing partnership is liable for all the obligations of the partnership arising before such admission as though the person had been a partner when such obligations were incurred; except that this liability shall be satisfied only out of partnership property.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 654, § 17.

CSA:

C. 123, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-17.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1425, § 79, effective July 1.

7-60-118. Rights and duties of partners.

The rights and duties of the partners in relation to the partnership shall be determined, subject to any agreement between them, by the following rules:

Each partner shall be repaid such partner's contributions, whether by way of capital or advances to the partnership property and share equally in the profits and surplus remaining after all liabilities, including those to partners, are satisfied and shall contribute toward the losses whether of capital or otherwise sustained by the partnership according to such partner's share in the profits; except that a partner in a limited liability partnership shall not be obligated to contribute to partnership losses in excess of the partner's interest in the partnership beyond the extent:

Such obligation to contribute is set out in a writing signed by the partner; or

Such loss is attributable to an obligation or liability for which the partner would have individual liability under section 7-60-115 (2).

The partnership shall indemnify every partner in respect of payments made and personal liabilities reasonably incurred by the partner in the ordinary and proper conduct of its business or for the preservation of its business or property.

A partner who in aid of the partnership makes any payment or advance beyond the amount of capital that the partner agreed to contribute shall be paid interest from the date of the payment or advance.

A partner shall receive interest on the capital contributed by the partner only from the date when repayment should be made.

All partners have equal rights in the management and conduct of the partnership business.

No partner is entitled to remuneration for acting in the partnership business, but a surviving partner is entitled to reasonable compensation for the partner's services in winding up the partnership affairs.

No person can become a member of a partnership without the consent of all the partners.

Any difference arising as to ordinary matters connected with the partnership business may be decided by a majority of the partners; but no act in contravention of any agreement between the partners may be done rightfully without the consent of all the partners.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 654, § 18.

CSA:

C. 123, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-18.

L. 95:

(1)(a) amended, p. 779, § 5, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

IP(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (1)(f) amended, p. 1425, § 80, effective July 1.

7-60-119. Partnership books.

The partnership books shall be kept, subject to any agreement between the partners, at the principal place of business of the partnership, and every partner shall at all times have access to and may inspect and copy any of them.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 655, § 19.

CSA:

C. 123, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-19.

7-60-120. Duty to render information.

Partners shall render on demand true and full information of all things affecting the partnership to any partner or the legal representative of any deceased partner under legal disability.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 656, § 20.

CSA:

C. 123, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-20.

7-60-121. Accountable as a fiduciary.

Every partner shall account to the partnership for any benefit and hold as trustee for it any profits derived by such partner without the consent of the other partners from any transaction connected with the formation, conduct, or liquidation of the partnership or from any use by such partner of its property.

This section applies also to the representatives of a deceased partner engaged in the liquidation of the affairs of the partnership as the personal representatives of the last surviving partner.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 656, § 21.

CSA:

C. 123, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-21.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1425, § 81, effective July 1.

7-60-122. Right to an account.

Any partner shall have the right to a formal account as to partnership affairs:

If the partner is wrongfully excluded from the partnership business or possession of its property by the other partners;

If the right exists under the terms of any agreement;

As provided by section 7-60-121;

Whenever other circumstances render it just and reasonable.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 656, § 22.

CSA:

C. 123, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-22.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1425, § 82, effective July 1.

7-60-123. Rights and duties beyond term.

When a partnership for a fixed term or particular undertaking is continued after the termination of such term or particular undertaking without any express agreement, the rights and duties of the partners remain the same as they were at such termination, insofar as is consistent with a partnership at will.

A continuation of the business by the partners or such of them as habitually acted therein during the term, without any settlement or liquidation of the partnership affairs, is prima facie evidence of a continuation of the partnership.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 657, § 23.

CSA:

C. 123, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-23.

7-60-124. Property rights of a partner.

The property rights of a partner are:

Such partner's rights in specific partnership property;

Such partner's interest in the partnership; and

Such partner's right to participate in the management.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 657, § 24.

CSA:

C. 123, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-24.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1426, § 83, effective July 1.

7-60-125. Right in specific property.

A partner is co-owner with the other partners of specific partnership property holding as a tenant in partnership.

The incidents of tenancy in partnership are such that:

A partner, subject to the provisions of this article and to any agreement between the partners, has an equal right with the other partners to possess specific partnership property for partnership purposes; except that a partner has no right to possess such property for any other purpose without the consent of the other partners;

A partner's right in specific partnership property is not assignable except in connection with the assignment of rights of all the partners in the same property;

A partner's right in specific partnership property is not subject to attachment or execution except on a claim against the partnership. When partnership property is attached for a partnership debt the partners, or any of them, or the representatives of a deceased partner, cannot claim any right under the homestead or exemption laws.

On the death of a partner, the deceased partner's right in specific partnership property vests in the surviving partner or partners, except where the deceased partner was the last surviving partner, when the right in such property vests in the deceased partner's legal representative. The surviving partner or partners or the legal representative of the last surviving partner has no right to possess the partnership property for any but a partnership purpose.

A partner's right in specific partnership property is not subject to dower, curtesy, or allowances to widows, heirs, or next of kin.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 657, § 25.

CSA:

C. 123, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-25.

L. 2004:

(1), (2)(a), and (2)(d) amended, p. 1426, § 84, effective July 1.

7-60-126. Nature of partner's interest.

A partner's interest in the partnership is the partner's share of the profits and surplus, and the same is personal property.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 659, § 26.

CSA:

C. 123, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-26.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1426, § 85, effective July 1.

7-60-127. Assignment of partner's interest.

A conveyance by a partner of the partner's interest in the partnership does not of itself dissolve the partnership, nor, as against the other partners in the absence of agreement, entitle the assignee, during the continuance of the partnership, to interfere in the management or administration of the partnership business or affairs, to require any information or account of partnership transactions, or to inspect the partnership books; but it merely entitles the assignee to receive in accordance with the assignee's contract the profits to which the assigning partner would otherwise be entitled.

In a dissolution of the partnership, the assignee is entitled to receive the assignor's interest and may require an account only from the date of the last account agreed to by all the partners.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 659, § 27.

CSA:

C. 123, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-27.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1426, § 86, effective July 1.

7-60-128. Interest subject to charging order.

On due application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court that entered the judgment, order, or decree, or any other court, may charge the interest of the debtor partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest thereon; and may then or later appoint a receiver of the debtor partner's share of the profits and of any other money due or to fall due to the debtor partner in respect of the partnership and make all other orders, directions, accounts, and inquiries that the debtor partner might have made, or that the circumstances of the case may require.

The interest charged may be redeemed at any time before foreclosure or, in case of a sale being directed by the court, may be purchased without thereby causing a dissolution:

With separate property by any one or more of the partners; or

With partnership property by any one or more of the partners with the consent of all the partners whose interests are not so charged or sold.

Nothing in this article shall be held to deprive a partner of the partner's right, if any, under the exemption laws, as regards the partner's interest in the partnership.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 659, § 28.

CSA:

C. 123, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-28.

L. 2004:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1427, § 87, effective July 1.

7-60-129. Dissolution defined.

The dissolution of a partnership is the change in the relation of the partners caused by any partner ceasing to be associated in the carrying on as distinguished from the winding up of the business.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 660, § 29.

CSA:

C. 123, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-29.

7-60-130. Dissolution is not termination.

On dissolution the partnership is not terminated but continues until the winding up of partnership affairs is completed.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 660, § 30.

CSA:

C. 123, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-30.

7-60-131. Causes of dissolution.

Dissolution is caused:

Without violation of the agreement between the partners:

By the termination of the definite term or particular undertaking stated in the agreement;

By the express will of any partner when no definite term or particular undertaking is stated;

By the express will of all the partners who have not assigned their interests or allowed them to be charged for their separate debts either before or after the termination of any stated term or particular undertaking;

By the expulsion of any partner from the business bona fide in accordance with such a power conferred by the agreement between the partners;

In contravention of the agreement between the partners, where the circumstances do not permit a dissolution under any other provision of this section, by the express will of any partner at any time;

By any event which makes it unlawful for the business of the partnership to be carried on or for the members to carry it on in partnership;

By the death of any partner;

By the bankruptcy of any partner or the partnership;

By decree of court under section 7-60-132.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 660, § 31.

CSA:

C. 123, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-31.

L. 2003:

(1)(a)(I) to (1)(a)(III) amended, p. 2236, § 112, effective July 1, 2004.

7-60-132. Dissolution by decree of court.

On application by or for a partner, the court shall decree a dissolution if:

A partner has been determined by the court to be mentally incompetent to such a degree that the partner is incapable of performing the partner's part of the partnership contract or a court of competent jurisdiction has made such a finding pursuant to part 3 or part 4 of article 14 of title 15 or section 27-65-110 (4) or 27-65-127;

A partner becomes in any other way incapable of performing the partner's part of the partnership contract;

A partner has been guilty of such conduct as tends to affect prejudicially the carrying on of business;

A partner willfully or persistently commits a breach of the partnership agreement or otherwise so acts in matters relating to the partnership business that it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in partnership with the partner;

The business of the partnership can only be carried on at a loss;

Other circumstances render a dissolution equitable.

On the application of the purchaser of a partner's interest under sections 7-60-127 and 7-60-128, the court shall decree a dissolution:

After the termination of the stated term or particular undertaking;

At any time if the partnership was a partnership at will when the interest was assigned or when the charging order was issued.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 662, § 32.

CSA:

C. 123, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-32.

L. 75:

(1)(a) R&RE, p. 922, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1781, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) amended, p. 2236, § 113, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(d) amended, p. 1427, § 88, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 777, § 4, effective April 29.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3222, § 6, effective August 10.

7-60-133. General effect of dissolution.

Except insofar as may be necessary to wind up partnership affairs or to complete transactions begun but not then finished, dissolution terminates all authority of any partner to act for the partnership:

With respect to the partners:

When the dissolution is not by the act, bankruptcy, or death of a partner; or

When the dissolution is by such act, bankruptcy, or death of a partner, in cases where section 7-60-134 so requires.

With respect to persons not partners, as declared in section 7-60-135.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 663, § 33.

CSA:

C. 123, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-33.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-33.

7-60-134. Right of partner to contribution.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, where the dissolution is caused by the act, death, or bankruptcy of a partner, each partner is liable to the other partners for such partner's share of any liability created by any partner acting for the partnership as if the partnership had not been dissolved unless:

The dissolution being by act of any partner, the partner acting for the partnership had knowledge of the dissolution; or

The dissolution being by the death or bankruptcy of a partner, the partner acting for the partnership had knowledge or notice of the death or bankruptcy.

A partner in a limited liability partnership shall not be liable to the other partners except to the extent that:

The partner's liability is set out in a writing signed by the partner; or

The partner's obligation to contribute is attributable to a liability for which the partner would have individual liability under section 7-60-115 (2).

Source:

L. 31:

p. 663, § 34.

CSA:

C. 123, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-34.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-34.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 780, § 6, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

IP(2) amended, p. 1427, § 89, effective July 1.

7-60-135. Power of partner to bind partnership after dissolution.

After dissolution, a partner can bind the partnership, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:

By any act appropriate for winding up partnership affairs or completing transactions unfinished at dissolution;

By any transaction which would bind the partnership if dissolution had not taken place, if the other party to the transaction:

Had extended credit to the partnership prior to dissolution and had no knowledge or notice of the dissolution; or

Though the other party had not so extended credit, had nevertheless known of the partnership prior to dissolution, and had no knowledge or notice of dissolution, the fact of dissolution having not been advertised in a newspaper of general circulation in the place, or in each place if more than one, at which the partnership business was regularly carried on.

The liability of a partner under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be satisfied out of partnership assets alone when such partner had been, prior to dissolution:

Unknown as a partner to the person with whom the contract is made; and

So far unknown and inactive in partnership affairs that the business reputation of the partnership could not be said to have been in any degree due to the partner's connection with it.

The partnership is in no case bound by any act of a partner after dissolution:

Where the partnership is dissolved because it is unlawful to carry on the business, unless the act is appropriate for winding up partnership affairs; or

Where the partner has become bankrupt; or

Where the partner has no authority to wind up partnership affairs except by transaction with one who:

Had extended credit to the partnership prior to dissolution and had no knowledge or notice of the partner's want of authority; or

Had not extended credit to the partnership prior to dissolution, and had no knowledge or notice of the partner's want of authority, the fact of the partner's want of authority having not been advertised in the manner provided for advertising the fact of dissolution in subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall affect the liability under section 7-60-116 of any person who, after dissolution, purports to be a partner or consents to being represented by another as a partner in a partnership engaged in carrying on business.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 664, § 35.

CSA:

C. 123, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-35.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-35.

L. 2004:

(1)(b)(II), (2)(b), (3)(c)(I), (3)(c)(II), and (4) amended, p. 1428, § 90, effective July 1.

7-60-136. Effect of dissolution on existing liability.

The dissolution of the partnership does not of itself discharge the existing liability of any partner.

A partner is discharged from any existing liability upon dissolution of the partnership by an agreement to that effect between such partner, the partnership creditor, and the person or partnership continuing the business; and such agreement may be inferred from the course of dealing between the creditor having knowledge of the dissolution and the person or partnership continuing the business.

Where a person agrees to assume the existing obligations of a dissolved partnership, the partners whose obligations have been assumed shall be discharged from any liability to any creditor of the partnership who, knowing of the agreement, consents to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of the creditor's obligations.

The individual property of a deceased person who was a partner shall be liable, to the extent the deceased person was or would have been liable under section 7-60-115, 7-60-118, or 7-60-134, for all obligations of the partnership incurred while the deceased person was a partner but subject to the prior payment of the deceased person's separate debts.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 666, § 36.

CSA:

C. 123, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-36.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-36.

L. 95:

(4) amended, p. 780, § 7, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

(2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1428, § 91, effective July 1.

7-60-137. Right to wind up.

Unless otherwise agreed, the partners who have not wrongfully dissolved the partnership or the legal representative of the last surviving partner, not bankrupt, has the right to wind up the partnership affairs; except that any partner or any partner's legal representative or assignee, upon cause shown, may obtain winding up by the court.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 667, § 37.

CSA:

C. 123, § 37.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-37.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-37.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1429, § 92, effective July 1.